Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-19] Remedies of an obligee:
mandamus; injunction; possessory action; receiver; accounting; etc. An
obligee of the corporation shall have the right, in addition to all other
rights that may be conferred on the obligee subject only to any contractual
restrictions binding upon the obligee, and subject to the prior and superior
rights of others:

(1) By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding in law
or equity to compel the corporation, and the members, officers, agents, or
employees thereof to perform each and every item, provision, and covenant
contained in any contract of the corporation, and to require the carrying out
of any or all covenants and agreements of the corporation and the fulfillment
of all duties imposed upon the corporation by this chapter;

(2) By suit, action, or proceeding in equity to
enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the
rights of the obligee of the corporation;

(3) By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of
competent jurisdiction to cause possession of any housing project or any part
thereof to be surrendered to any obligee having the right to possession
pursuant to any contract of the corporation;

(4) By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of
competent jurisdiction, upon the happening of an event of default (as defined
in a contract of the corporation), to obtain the appointment of a receiver of
any housing project of the corporation or any part or parts thereof, and if the
receiver is appointed, the receiver may enter and take possession of the
housing project or any part or parts thereof and operate and maintain same, and
collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter
arising therefrom in the same manner as the corporation itself might do and
shall keep the moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in
accordance with the obligations of the corporation as the court shall direct;
and

(5) By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of
competent jurisdiction to require the corporation and the members thereof to
account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust. [L 2005, c
196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §15]

Case Notes

Mentioned: 903 F. Supp. 2d 1037 (2012).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next